Utah statutes.
62A-5b-106.   Interference with rights provided in this chapter --
Misrepresentation of rights under this chapter.
(1)  Any person, or agent of any person, who denies or interferes with the
rights provided in this chapter is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
(2)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if:
(a)  the person intentionally and knowingly falsely represents to another
person that an animal is a service animal as defined in Section 62A-5b-102; or
(b)  the person knowingly and intentionally misrepresents a material fact to a
health care provider for the purpose of obtaining documentation from the
health care provider necessary to designate an animal as a service animal as
defined in Section 62A-5b-102.
